Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2619
Act; applicability.

The Assistive Technology Regulation Act shall apply to assistive devices delivered after September 13, 1997, and shall in no way be applied retroactively.

Laws 1997, LB 802, § 19.